Maryland, session 2025, SB0044.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Transportation
21–901.1.
(a) A person is guilty of reckless driving if he drives a motor vehicle:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0044*

SENATE BILL 44
(1) In wanton or willful disregard for the safety of persons or property; or
(2) In a manner that indicates a wanton or willful disregard for the safety
of persons or property.
(b) A person is guilty of negligent driving if he drives a motor vehicle in a careless
or imprudent manner that endangers any property or the life or person of any individual.
(c) (1) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN PARAGRAPH (2) OF THIS SUBSECTION, A
PERSON CHARGED WITH A VIOLATION OF THIS SECTION THAT CONTRIBUTES TO AN
ACCIDENT THAT RESULTS IN THE DEATH OF ANOTHER:
(I) MUST APPEAR IN COURT; AND
(II) MAY NOT PREPAY THE FINE.
(2) AFTER A COURT HAS ISSUED A WRIT SETTING THE DATE, TIME,
AND PLACE FOR THE PERSON TO APPEAR, THE COURT MAY, FOR GOOD CAUSE
SHOWN:
(I) WAIVE THE REQUIREMENT TO APPEAR IN COURT; AND
(II) ALLOW THE PERSON TO ENTER A PLEA OF GUILTY AND
PREPAY THE FINE.
(D) A person convicted of a violation of subsection (a) of this section is subject to a
fine not exceeding $1,000.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.